Utah statutes.
62A-5a-103.   Coordinating Council for Persons with Disabilities -- Creation
-- Membership -- Expenses.
(1)  There is created the Coordinating Council for Persons with Disabilities.
(2)  The council shall consist of:
(a)  the director of the Division of Services for People with Disabilities
within the Department of Human Services, or his designee;
(b)  the director of family health services programs, appointed under Section
26-10-3, or his designee;
(c)  the executive director of the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation, or his
designee;
(d)  the state director of special education, or his designee;
(e)  the director of the Division of Health Care Financing within the
Department of Health, or his designee;
(f)  the director of the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health within
the Department of Human Services, or his designee;
(g)  the superintendent of Schools for the Deaf and Blind, or his designee;
and
(h)  a person with a disability, a family member of a person with a
disability, or an advocate for persons with disabilities, appointed by the
members listed in Subsections (2)(a) through (g).
(3) (a)  The council shall annually elect a chair from its membership.
(b)  Five members of the council are a quorum.
(4) (a)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the council at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
